Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4114.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section, “property” means:
(a) Buildings, structures, land and curtilage.
(b) Vehicles located on private property or in a location where the owner of the vehicle
has a reasonable expectation of privacy.
(c) A church, synagogue, temple, mosque, chapel, meeting house or other nonresidential
place of worship.
(d) A school or other educational facility.
(e) A facility that provides medical treatment.
(f) Any place where a person has a reasonable expectation of privacy.
(2) An owner or occupant of property, or a person lawfully present on property with a
reasonable expectation of privacy, may bring a cause of action against an individual who
under color of law enters the property without a warrant for which the issuing authority is
a court, if a judicially recognized exception to the warrant requirement does not apply.
(3) A plaintiff who prevails in a cause of action under this section may recover actual
economic and noneconomic damages, equitable relief and any other appropriate relief.
(4)(a) In an action brought under this section, the court shall award reasonable attorney
fees and costs to a prevailing plaintiff. In an action for injunctive relief under this section,
the court shall deem a plaintiff to have prevailed if the plaintiff’s suit was a substantial
factor or significant catalyst in obtaining the results sought by the litigation.
(b) The court may award reasonable attorney fees and costs to a defendant in an action
under this section for defending any claims the court finds frivolous.
(5) A person may not bring an action under this section against a person subject to suit
for the injury under 42 U.S.C. 1983, including but not limited to a law enforcement agency
or an officer, as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.822.
(6) An action under this section must be commenced within two years after the cause
of action accrues.
Enrolled House Bill 4114 (HB 4114-A) Page 1

SECTION 2. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 18, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by Senate March 5, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4114 (HB 4114-A) Page 2